Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB604.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 75.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the creation of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire department
district as provided in KRS 75.010 to 75.031, the board of trustees of a
district is[are] authorized to establish and operate a fire department and
emergency ambulance service as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
(2) (a) The board of trustees established under KRS 75.031 has the authority[and]
to levy a tax upon the property in the district. Property that may be taxed
includes property within cities in a fire protection district or a volunteer fire
department district:
1. As provided by KRS 75.022; or
2. Within the metes and bounds of a city that does not maintain a regular
fire department as defined by KRS 95.010(3)(b).
The property taxed shall be subject to county tax, and the tax levied by the
district shall not exceed twenty cents ($0.20)[ten cents ($0.10)] per one
hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for the
purpose of defraying the expenses of the establishment, maintenance, and
operation of the fire department or to make contracts for fire protection for the
districts as provided in KRS 75.050.[ The rate set in this subsection shall
apply, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 132.023.]
(b) A fire protection district or a volunteer fire department district that establishes
and operates an emergency ambulance service and is the primary service
provider in the district may levy a tax upon the property in the district not to
exceed thirty cents ($0.30)[twenty cents ($0.20)] per one hundred dollars
($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for the purpose of defraying
the expenses of the establishment, maintenance, and operation of the fire
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1001
department and emergency ambulance service or to make contracts for fire
protection for the districts as provided in KRS 75.050.[ The rate set in this
subsection shall apply, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 132.023.]
(c) Except for the rate initially levied upon the creation of the district, any
increase of the total tax shall not exceed the tax rate levied for the
immediately preceding calendar year by more than two cents ($0.02) per one
hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation.
(d) 1. The board of trustees of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire
department district proposing to levy a tax rate that exceeds the tax
rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar year shall hold a
public hearing within thirty (30) days of proposing the levy to hear
comments from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The
hearing shall be open to the public, and all persons desiring to be
heard shall be given an opportunity to present oral testimony.
2. Notification of the public hearing shall be advertised for two (2)
consecutive weeks on the website of the fire protection district or
volunteer fire department district. If the district does not have a
website, the notification shall be advertised on the website of the local
government in which the fire protection district or volunteer fire
department district is located. The notification shall provide:
a. The tax rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar year,
and the revenue produced by that rate;
b. The tax rate proposed for the current calendar year and the
revenue expected to be produced by that rate;
c. A time and place for the public hearing;
d. The purpose of the public hearing;
e. The purpose of the tax rate increase, which shall be related to
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1001
protecting life and property by:
i. Responding to fires;
ii. Conducting fire prevention education; or
iii. Providing emergency medical or rescue services to the
community; and
f. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained
therein.
3. If the board of trustees of a fire protection district or a volunteer fire
department district fails to comply with the public hearing
requirements in this paragraph, the proposed tax rate shall not go into
effect and the tax rate from the immediately preceding calendar year
shall be levied.
(e) The rates set in this subsection shall not be subject to KRS 132.023.
(2) The establishment, maintenance, and operation of a fire protection district or
volunteer fire department district shall include, but not be limited to, the following
activities:
(a) Acquisition and maintenance of adequate fire protection facilities;
(b) Acquisition and maintenance of adequate firefighting equipment;
(c) Recruitment, training, and supervision of firefighters;
(d) Control and extinguishment of fires;
(e) Prevention of fires;
(f) Conducting fire safety activities;
(g) Payment of compensation to firefighters and providing the necessary support
and supervisory personnel;
(h) Payment for reasonable benefits or a nominal fee to volunteer firefighters
when benefits and fees do not constitute wages or salaries under KRS Chapter
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1001
337 and are not taxable as income to the volunteer firefighters under
Kentucky or federal income tax laws; and
(i) The use of fire protection district equipment for activities which are for a
public purpose and which do not materially diminish the value of the
equipment.
(3) The property valuation administrator of the county or counties involved, with the
cooperation of the board of trustees, shall note on the tax rolls the taxpayers and
valuation of the property subject to such assessment. The county clerk shall
compute the tax on the regular state and county tax bills in such manner as may be
directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.
(4) Such taxes shall be subject to the same delinquency date, discounts, penalties, and
interest as are applied to the collection of ad valorem taxes and shall be collected by
the sheriff of the county or counties involved and accounted for to the treasurer of
the district. The sheriff shall be entitled to a fee of one percent (1%) of the amount
collected by him.
(5) Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the trustees of a
fire protection district located in a city or county which provides emergency
ambulance service from using funds derived from taxes for the purpose of
providing supplemental emergency medical services so long as the mayor of the
city or the county judge/executive of the county, as appropriate, certifies to the
trustees in writing that supplemental emergency medical services are reasonably
required in the public interest. For the purposes of this subsection, "supplemental
emergency medical services" may include EMT, EMT-D, and paramedic services
rendered at the scene of an emergent accident or illness until an emergency
ambulance can arrive at the scene.
(6) The trustees of those fire protection districts or volunteer fire department districts
whose districts or portions thereof do not receive emergency ambulance services
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1001
from an emergency ambulance service district or, whose districts are not being
served by an emergency ambulance service operated or contracted by a city or
county government, may develop, maintain, and operate or contract for an
emergency ambulance service as part of any fire department created pursuant to this
chapter. No taxes levied pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be used to
develop, maintain, operate, or contract for an emergency ambulance service until
the tax year following the year the trustees of the district authorize the
establishment of the emergency ambulance service.
Section 2. KRS 75A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the creation of a district, the board of trustees of a district is[are]
authorized to provide fire services, emergency medical services subject to
KRS Chapter 311A, or rescue services pursuant to KRS Chapter 39F, as
provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection[, and to levy a tax upon the
property in the district].
(b) The board of trustees established under KRS 75A.030 has the authority to
levy a tax upon the property in the district. The property taxed shall be
subject to county tax, and the tax levied by the board upon creation of the
district shall be approved by the county fiscal court, consolidated local
government, charter county government, or unified local government having
jurisdiction over the district at the time of passage of the ordinance creating
the district. The tax shall not exceed twenty cents ($0.20)[ten cents ($0.10)]
per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for
the purpose of defraying the expenses for the provision of fire services or
rescue services.[ The rate set in this subsection shall apply, notwithstanding
the provisions of KRS 132.023.]
(c) The district that establishes and operates an emergency ambulance service and
is the primary service provider in the district may levy a tax upon the property
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1001
in the district. The tax to be levied shall be proposed by the board, shall be
approved by the county fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter
county government, or unified local government having jurisdiction over the
district and the tax shall not exceed thirty cents ($0.30)[twenty cents ($0.20)]
per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for
the purpose of defraying the expenses of the provision of fire services,
emergency medical services, or rescue service, or to make contracts for fire
protection for the districts as provided in KRS 75.050.[ The rate set in this
subsection shall apply, notwithstanding KRS 132.023.]
(d) [1. ]Except for the rate initially levied upon the creation of the district,
any increase of the total tax[ levy beyond the rate initially approved by the
board and authorized by the county fiscal court, consolidated local
government, charter county government, or unified local government] shall
not exceed the tax rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar year
by more than two cents ($0.02) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed
valuation.
(e) 1. The board of trustees of the district proposing to levy a tax rate that
exceeds the tax rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar year
shall hold a public hearing within thirty (30) days of proposing the
levy to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax
rate. The hearing shall be open to the public, and all persons desiring
to be heard shall be given an opportunity to present oral testimony.
2. Notification of the public hearing shall be advertised for two (2)
consecutive weeks on the website of the district. If the district does not
have a website, the notification shall be advertised on the website of
the local government in which the district is located. The notification
shall provide:
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1001
a. The tax rate levied for the immediately preceding calendar year,
and the revenue produced by that rate;
b. The tax rate proposed for the current calendar year and the
revenue expected to be produced by that rate;
c. A time and place for the public hearing;
d. The purpose of the public hearing;
e. The purpose of the tax rate increase, which shall be related to
protecting life and property by:
i. Responding to fires;
ii. Conducting fire prevention education; or
iii. Providing emergency medical or rescue services to the
community; and
f. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained
therein.
3. If the board of trustees of the district fails to comply with the public
hearing requirements in this paragraph, the proposed tax rate shall
not go into effect and the tax rate from the immediately preceding
calendar year shall be levied.
(f) The rates set in this subsection shall not be subject to KRS 132.023.[ Any
increase in excess of the annual compensating rate for the consolidated
emergency services district shall require the approval of the county fiscal
court, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified
local government having jurisdiction over the district. If at any time an
election resulting from a recall petition pursuant to KRS 132.017 is required,
the question shall be presented to all voters in every precinct for which any
part of the precinct is served by the district subject to the recall petition.]
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1001
(2)[2.] If two (2) or more established consolidated emergency services merge to
create a new consolidated emergency services district, as authorized in this chapter,
the initial tax to be levied, as proposed by the board, shall be approved by the
county fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter county government, or
unified local government having jurisdiction over the district, and the initial tax
levied shall not exceed the highest tax rate currently levied by one (1) of the
merging districts. Any increase to the initial tax rate shall be subject to KRS
132.023. Any increase in excess of the annual compensating rate for the
consolidated emergency services district shall require the approval of the county
fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified
local government having jurisdiction over the district. If at any time an election
resulting from a recall petition pursuant to KRS 132.017 is required, the question
shall be presented to all voters in every precinct for which any part of the district
serves.
(3)[(2)] The property valuation administrator of the county in which the district is
created, with the cooperation of the board, shall note on the tax rolls the taxpayers
and valuation of the property subject to such assessment. The county clerk shall
compute the tax on the regular state and county tax bills in such manner as may be
directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.
(4)[(3)] These taxes shall be subject to the same delinquency date, discounts,
penalties, and interest as are applied to the collection of ad valorem taxes and shall
be collected by the sheriff of the county involved and accounted for to the treasurer
of the district. The sheriff shall be entitled to a fee of the amount collected by him
or her. The fiscal court shall, by[in the ]ordinance [set forth in subsection (2) of this
section ]and in consultation with the sheriff and the consolidated emergency
services district, set a collection fee for the sheriff in an amount not to exceed four
and one-fourth percent (4.25%).
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1001
Section 3. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:37 AM Jacketed